Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202658-808
Private health care institution, defined.

Private health care institution means any private not-for-profit corporation or institution that (1) is licensed under the Health Care Facility Licensure Act, (2) is described in section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code and is exempt from federal income taxation under section 501(a) of the Internal Revenue Code, (3) is located within this state and is not owned or controlled by the state or any political subdivision, agency, instrumentality, district, or municipality thereof, and (4) does not violate any Nebraska or federal law against discrimination on the basis of race, color, creed, national origin, ancestry, age, gender, handicap, or military or veteran status.

Laws 2013, LB170, § 8;

Laws 2025, LB150, § 95.

Health Care Facility Licensure Act, see section 71-401.